Hawaii statutes.
[§195-1] Findings and declaration of
necessity. The legislature finds and declares that (1) the State of Hawaii
possesses unique natural resources, such as geological and volcanological
features and distinctive marine and terrestrial plants and animals, many of
which occur nowhere else in the world, that are highly vulnerable to loss by
the growth of population and technology; (2) these unique natural assets should
be protected and preserved, both for the enjoyment of future generations, and
to provide base lines against which changes which are being made in the
environments of Hawaii can be measured; (3) in order to accomplish these
purposes the present system of preserves, sanctuaries and refuges must be
strengthened, and additional areas of land and shoreline suitable for
preservation should be set aside and administered solely and specifically for
the aforesaid purposes; and (4) that a statewide natural area reserves system
should be established to preserve in perpetuity specific land and water areas which
support communities, as relatively unmodified as possible, of the natural flora
and fauna, as well as geological sites, of Hawaii. [L 1970, c 139, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next